apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="/আছ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছিলাম</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছিল</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকলে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pcnd" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আছেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকল</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থেকে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ppst" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থেকো</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আছে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকলি</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকুন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রইতে থাকব</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিল</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছিল</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকব</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিল</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকতে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিলাম</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকুন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকলে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রইতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আছিস</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আছি</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছি</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছিলি</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকলেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকা</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ger" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকতেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাক</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকবেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকত</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রইতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছিস</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আছ</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ছিলেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছিলে</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>থাকছ</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রইতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>আছিস</l>
          <r>আছ<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="আছ">
      <i />
      <par n="/আছ__vblex" />
    </e>
